Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-4011
Issuance of license; rights.

Upon receipt of an application in proper form and payment of the fee, the Tax Commissioner shall issue a license to the applicant, except as provided in section 77-4013. The license shall permit the applicant to whom it is issued to engage in business at the place of business shown on the license. A license shall not be assignable, shall be valid only for the person in whose name it is issued, and shall be valid unless suspended, canceled, or revoked by the Tax Commissioner.

Laws 1987, LB 730, § 11.